North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-39.2 Sales Tax

57-39.2-01.
Definitions.

The following words, terms, and phrases, when used in this chapter, have the meaning ascribed to them in this section, unless the context clearly indicates a different meaning:

“Bundled transaction” means the retail sale of two or more products, except real property and services to real property, where the products are otherwise distinct and identifiable, and the products are sold for one nonitemized price. A bundled transaction does not include the sale of any products in which the sales price varies, or is negotiable, based on the selection by the purchaser of the products included in the transaction.

Distinct and identifiable products do not include:

Packaging such as containers, boxes, sacks, bags, and bottles or other materials such as wrapping, labels, tags, and instruction guides that accompany the retail sale of the products and are incidental or immaterial to the retail sale. Examples of packaging that are incidental or immaterial include grocery sacks, shoeboxes, drycleaning garment bags, and express delivery envelopes and boxes.

A product provided free of charge with the required purchase of another product. A product is provided free of charge if the sales price of the product purchased does not vary depending on the inclusion of the product provided free of charge.

Items included in the definition of gross receipts.

The phrase “one nonitemized price” does not include a price that is separately identified by product on binding sales or other supporting sales-related documentation made available to the customer in paper or electronic form, including an invoice, bill of sale, receipt, contract, service agreement, lease agreement, periodic notice of rates and services, rate card, or price list.

A transaction that otherwise meets the definition of a bundled transaction as defined in this section is not a “bundled transaction” if it is:

The retail sale of tangible personal property and a service where the tangible personal property is essential to the use of the service, and is provided exclusively in connection with the service, and the true object of the transaction is the service;

The retail sale of services where one service is provided that is essential to the use or receipt of a second service and the first service is provided exclusively in connection with the second service and the true object of the transaction is the second service;

A transaction that includes taxable products and nontaxable products and the purchase price or sales price of the taxable products is de minimis.

“De minimis” means the seller’s purchase price or sales price of the taxable products is ten percent or less of the total purchase price or sales price of the bundled products.

Sellers shall use either the purchase price or the sales price of the products to determine if the taxable products are de minimis. Sellers may not use a combination of the purchase price and sales price of the products to determine if the taxable products are de minimis.

Sellers shall use the full term of a service contract to determine if the taxable products are de minimis; or

The retail sale of exempt tangible personal property and taxable tangible personal property where:

The transaction includes food and food ingredients, drugs, durable medical equipment, mobility-enhancing equipment, over-the-counter drugs, prosthetic devices, or medical supplies; and

If the seller’s purchase price or sales price of the taxable tangible personal property is fifty percent or less of the total purchase price or sales price of the bundled tangible personal property. Sellers may not use a combination of the purchase price and sales price of the tangible personal property when making the fifty percent determination for a transaction.

“Business” includes any activity engaged in by any person or caused to be engaged in by the person with the object of gain, benefit, or advantage, either direct or indirect.

“Certified automated system” means software certified under chapter 57-39.4 to calculate the tax imposed by each jurisdiction on a transaction, determine the amount of tax to remit to the state, and maintain a record of the transaction.

“Certified service provider” means an agent certified under the agreement adopted under chapter 57-39.4 to perform all of the seller’s sales and use tax functions, other than the seller’s obligation to remit taxes on its own purchases.

“Commissioner” means the tax commissioner of the state of North Dakota.

“Computer software maintenance contract” is a contract that obligates a vendor of computer software to provide a customer with future updates or upgrades to computer software, support services with respect to computer software, or both.

“Delivery charges” means charges by the seller for preparation and delivery to a location designated by the purchaser of personal property or services. For purposes of this subsection, “preparation and delivery” includes transportation, shipping, postage, handling, crating, and packing. If shipment includes exempt property and taxable property, the seller should allocate the delivery charge by using a percentage based on:

The total sales price of the taxable property compared to the total sales price of all property in the shipment; or

The total weight of the taxable property compared to the total weight of all property in the shipment.

“Direct mail” means printed material delivered or distributed by United States mail or other delivery service to a mass audience or to addresses on a mailing list provided by the purchaser or at the direction of the purchaser when the cost of the items are not billed directly to the recipients. “Direct mail” includes tangible personal property supplied directly or indirectly by the purchaser to the direct mail seller for inclusion in the package containing the printed material. “Direct mail” does not include multiple items of printed material delivered to a single address.

“Drug” means a compound, substance, or preparation and any component of a compound, substance, or preparation, other than food and food ingredients, dietary supplements, or alcoholic beverages:

Recognized in the official United States pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official national formulary, or any supplement of any of these publications;

Intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease; or

Intended to affect the structure or any function of the body.

“Farm machinery” means all vehicular implements and attachment units, designed and sold for direct use in planting, cultivating, or harvesting farm products or used in connection with the production of agricultural produce or products, livestock, or poultry on farms, which are operated, drawn, or propelled by motor or animal power. “Farm machinery” does not include vehicular implements operated wholly by hand or a motor vehicle required to be registered under chapter 57-40.3. “Farm machinery” does not include machinery that may be used for other than agricultural purposes, including tires, farm machinery repair parts, tools, shop equipment, grain bins, feed bunks, fencing materials, and other farm supplies and equipment. For purposes of this subsection, “attachment unit” means any part or combination of parts having an independent function, other than farm machinery repair parts, which when attached or affixed to farm machinery is used exclusively for agricultural purposes.

“Farm machinery repair parts” means repair or replacement parts for farm machinery that have a specific or generic part number assigned by the manufacturer of the farm machinery. “Farm machinery repair parts” do not include tires, fluid, gas, grease, lubricant, wax, or paint.

“Gross receipts” means the measure subject to sales tax and means the total amount of consideration, including cash, credit, property, and services, for which personal property or services are sold, leased, or rented, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise, without any deduction for the following:

The seller’s cost of the property sold;

The cost of materials used, labor or service costs, interest, losses, all costs of transportation to the seller, all taxes imposed on the seller, and any other expense of the seller;

Charges by the seller for any services necessary to complete the sale, other than delivery and installation charges;

Delivery charges; and

Credit for any trade-in, as determined by state law.

“Gross receipts” also includes consideration received by the seller from third parties if:

The seller actually receives consideration from a party other than the purchaser and the consideration is directly related to a price reduction or discount on the sale;

The seller has an obligation to pass the price reduction or discount through to the purchaser;

The amount of the consideration attributable to the sale is fixed and determinable by the seller at the time of the sale of the item to the purchaser; and

One of the following criteria is met:

The purchaser presents a coupon, certificate, or other documentation to the seller to claim a price reduction or discount where the coupon, certificate, or documentation is authorized, distributed, or granted by a third party with the understanding that the third party will reimburse any seller to whom the coupon, certificate, or documentation is presented;

The purchaser provides identification to the seller to show that the purchaser is a member of a group or organization entitled to a price reduction or discount, however, a “preferred customer” card that is available to any patron does not constitute membership in such a group; or

The price reduction or discount is identified as a third-party price reduction or discount on the invoice received by the purchaser or on a coupon, certificate, or other documentation presented by the purchaser.

“Gross receipts” also includes the total amount of sales of every clerk, auctioneer, agent, or factor selling tangible personal property owned by any other retailer.

“Gross receipts” does not include:

Discounts, including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third party, which are allowed by a seller and taken by a purchaser on a sale;

Interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the sale of personal property or services, if the amount is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser;

Any taxes legally imposed directly on the consumer that are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar documents given to the purchaser;

The sale price of property returned by a customer when the full sale price is refunded either in cash or credit. When tangible personal property is taken in trade or in a series of trades as a credit or part payment of a retail sale taxable under this chapter, if the tangible personal property traded in will be subject to tax imposed by chapter 57-39.5 or 57-40.3 or if the tangible personal property traded in is used farm machinery or used irrigation equipment, the credit or trade-in value allowed by the retailer is not included in gross receipts of the retailer; and

The amount of compensation received from an insurance company for the loss of a stolen or totally destroyed watercraft that has been previously taxed under this chapter or chapter 57-40.2, if that compensation is used as a trade-in on the purchase of a replacement watercraft. The trade-in credit is not included in the gross receipts of the retailer.

If a watercraft is purchased by an owner who has had a watercraft stolen or totally destroyed, a trade-in credit must be allowed against one or more replacement watercraft purchases in a cumulative amount not to exceed the total amount of compensation from the insurance company for the loss.

The purchaser of a replacement watercraft shall provide the seller with an original notarized statement from the insurance company verifying the original watercraft was a total loss and indicating the date and amount of compensation.

If the full amount of trade-in credit under this section has not been used, the seller shall record on the face of the notarized statement the necessary information to identify partial use of the credit, retain a copy of the notarized statement to verify the credit allowed, and return the original notarized statement to the purchaser. If the full amount of the credit has been used, the seller shall retain the original notarized statement to verify the amount of trade-in credit allowed.

Trade-in credit for a watercraft stolen or totally destroyed may be applied to purchases of replacement watercraft made within three years from the date of compensation by the insurance company.

“Irrigation equipment repair parts” means repair or replacement parts for irrigation equipment which have a specific or generic part number assigned by the manufacturer of the irrigation equipment. The term does not include tires, fluid, gas, grease, lubricant, wax, or paint.

“Lease or rental” means any transfer of possession or control of tangible personal property for a fixed or indeterminate term for consideration. A lease or rental may include future options to purchase or extend. “Lease or rental” does not include:

A transfer of possession or control of property under a security agreement or deferred payment plan, which requires the transfer upon completion of the required payments;

A transfer of possession or control of property under an agreement that requires the transfer of title upon completion of required payments and payment of an option price that does not exceed the greater of one hundred dollars or one percent of the total required payments; or

Providing tangible personal property with an operator for a fixed or indeterminate period of time. A condition of this exclusion is that the operator is necessary for the equipment to perform as designed. For the purpose of this subdivision, an operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property.

“Local governmental unit” means incorporated cities, counties, school districts, and townships.

“Mandatory computer software maintenance contract” is a computer software maintenance contract that the customer is obligated by contract to purchase as a condition to the retail sale of computer software.

“Optional computer software maintenance contract” is a computer software maintenance contract that the customer is not obligated to purchase as a condition to the retail sale of computer software.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, partnership, joint venture, association, corporation, limited liability company, estate, business trust, receiver, or any other group or combination acting as a unit and the plural as well as the singular number.

“Prescription” means an order, formula, or recipe issued in any form of oral, written, electronic, or other means of transmission by a person authorized by the laws of this state to prescribe drugs.

“Relief agency” means the state, any county, city and county, city or district thereof, or an agency engaged in actual relief work.

“Retail sale” or “sale at retail” means any sale, lease, or rental for any purpose other than for resale, sublease, or subrental. “Retail sale” or “sale at retail” includes the sale, including the leasing or renting, to a consumer or to any person for any purpose, other than for processing or for resale, of tangible personal property; the sale of steam, gas, and communication service, excluding internet access service, to retail consumers or users; the sale of vulcanizing, recapping, and retreading services for tires; the ordering, selecting, or aiding a customer to select any goods, wares, or merchandise from any price list or catalog, which the customer might order, or be ordered for such customer to be shipped directly to such customer; the sale or furnishing of hotel, motel, or other accommodations, tickets, or admissions to any place of amusement, athletic event, or place of entertainment; and the sales of magazines and other periodicals. By the term “processing” is meant any tangible personal property, including containers which it is intended, by means of fabrication, compounding, manufacturing, producing, or germination shall become an integral or an ingredient or component part of other tangible personal property intended to be sold ultimately at retail. The sale of an item of tangible personal property for the purpose of incorporating it in or attaching it to real property must be considered as a sale of tangible personal property for a purpose other than for processing; the delivery of possession within the state of North Dakota of tangible personal property by a wholesaler or distributor to an out-of-state retailer who does not hold a North Dakota retail sales tax permit or to a person who by contract incorporates such tangible personal property into, or attaches it to, real property situated in another state may not be considered a taxable sale if such delivery of possession would not be treated as a taxable sale in that state. As used in this subsection, the word “consumer” includes any hospital, infirmary, sanatorium, nursing home, home for the aged, or similar institution that furnishes services to any patient or occupant. The sale of an item of tangible personal property to a person under a finance leasing agreement over the term of which the property will be substantially consumed must be considered a retail sale if the purchaser elects to treat it as such by paying or causing the transferor to pay the sales tax thereon to the commissioner on or before the last day on which payments may be made without penalty as provided in section 57-39.2-12.

“Retailer” or “seller” includes every person engaged in the business of leasing or renting hotel, motel, or other accommodations, and every person engaged in the business of selling tangible goods, wares, or merchandise at retail, or furnishing of steam, gas, and communication services, excluding internet access service, or tickets or admissions to places of amusement, entertainment, and athletic events, or magazines or other periodicals; and includes any person as herein defined who by contract or otherwise agrees to furnish for a consideration a totally or partially finished product consisting in whole or in part of tangible personal property subject to the sales tax herein provided, and all items of tangible personal property entering into the performance of such contract as a component part of the product agreed to be furnished under said contract shall be subject to the sales tax herein provided and the sales tax thereon shall be collected by the contractor from the person for whom the contract has been performed in addition to the contract price agreed upon, and shall be remitted to the state in the manner provided in this chapter; and shall include the state or any municipality furnishing steam, gas, or communication service to members of the public in its proprietary capacity. For the purpose of this chapter, retailer shall also include every clerk, auctioneer, agent, or factor selling tangible personal property owned by any other retailer.

“Sale” means any transfer of title or possession, exchange or barter, conditional or otherwise, in any manner or by any means whatever, for a consideration, and includes the furnishing or service of steam, gas, or communication, excluding internet access service, the furnishing of hotel, motel, or other accommodations, the furnishing of tickets or admissions to any place of amusement, athletic event, or place of entertainment, and sales of magazines and other periodicals. Provided, the words “magazines and other periodicals” as used in this subsection do not include newspapers nor magazines or periodicals that are furnished free by a nonprofit corporation or organization to its members or because of payment by its members of membership fees or dues.

“Sales tax” means the tax levied under section 57-39.2-02.1 or a conforming tax imposed under home rule authority by a city or county.

“Tangible personal property” means personal property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched or that is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. “Tangible personal property” includes electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten computer software.

The seller must tax the percentage of the delivery charge allocated to the taxable property but does not have to tax the percentage allocated to the exempt property.

This definition will be applied only prospectively from the date of adoption and will have no retroactive impact on existing leases or rentals.

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 1; 1969, ch. 519, § 1; 1969, ch. 529, § 1; 1971, ch. 566, § 1; 1973, ch. 478, § 1; 1975, ch. 545, § 1; 1977, ch. 542, § 1; 1977, ch. 544, § 1; 1979, ch. 615, § 1; 1981, ch. 598, § 1; 1981, ch. 599, § 1; 1981, ch. 600, § 1; 1983, ch. 643, § 1; 1987, ch. 687, § 2, R.M. disapproved June 14, 1988; 1987, ch. 703, § 1; 1987, ch. 704, § 1; 1989, ch. 713, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 570, § 1; 2001, ch. 534, § 1; 2003, ch. 539, § 4; 2005, ch. 15, § 40; 2005, ch. 569, § 1; 2005, ch. 580, § 4; 2005, ch. 582, § 2; 2007, ch. 528, § 3; 2007, ch. 446, § 3; 2009, ch. 556, § 1; 2009, ch. 557, § 1; 2009, ch. 558, § 1; 2011, ch. 465, § 1; 2013, ch. 457, § 1; 2015, ch. 450, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 95, § 2, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2019; 2019, ch. 341, § 4, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 495, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 496, § 1, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2019.

57-39.2-02.
Sales tax imposed. [Repealed]

Repealed by I.M. approved November 2, 1976, S.L. 1977, ch. 593, § 6.

57-39.2-02.1.
Sales tax imposed.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, there is imposed a tax of five percent upon the gross receipts of retailers from all sales at retail, including the leasing or renting of tangible personal property as provided in this section, within this state of the following to consumers or users:

Tangible personal property, consisting of goods, wares, or merchandise, and bundled transactions consisting entirely of tangible personal property.

The furnishing or service of communication services, excluding internet access service but including one-way and two-way telecommunications services or steam other than steam used for processing agricultural products.

Tickets or admissions to places of amusement or entertainment or athletic events, including amounts charged for participation in an amusement, entertainment, or athletic activity.

Magazines and other periodicals.

The leasing or renting of a hotel or motel room or other accommodations.

The leasing or renting of tangible personal property the transfer of title to which has not been subjected to a retail sales tax under this chapter or a use tax under chapter 57-40.2.

Sale, lease, or rental of a computer and prewritten computer software, including prewritten computer software delivered electronically or by load and leave. For purposes of this subdivision:

“Computer” means an electronic device that accepts information in digital or similar form and manipulates it for a result based on a sequence of instructions.

“Computer software” means a set of coded instructions designed to cause a computer or automatic data processing equipment to perform a task.

“Delivered electronically” means delivered from the seller to the purchaser by means other than tangible storage media.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Load and leave” means delivery to the purchaser by use of a tangible storage media when the tangible storage media is not physically transferred to the purchaser.

“Prewritten computer software” means computer software, including prewritten upgrades, which is not designed and developed by the author or other creator to the specifications of a specific purchaser. The combining of two or more “prewritten computer software” programs or prewritten portions thereof does not cause the combination to be other than “prewritten computer software”. “Prewritten computer software” includes software designed and developed by the author or other creator to the specifications of a specific purchaser when it is sold to a person other than the purchaser. If a person modifies or enhances “computer software” of which the person is not the author or creator, the person is deemed to be the author or creator only of such person’s modifications or enhancements. “Prewritten computer software” or a prewritten portion thereof that is modified or enhanced to any degree, if such modification or enhancement is designed and developed to the specifications of a specific purchaser, remains “prewritten computer software”. However, if there is a reasonable, separately stated charge or an invoice or other statement of the price given to the purchaser for such modification or enhancement, such modification or enhancement shall not constitute “prewritten computer software”.

A mandatory computer software maintenance contract for prewritten computer software.

An optional computer software maintenance contract for prewritten computer software that provides only software upgrades or updates or an optional computer software maintenance contract for prewritten computer software that is a bundled transaction and provides software upgrades or updates and support services.

For purposes of manufactured homes, as defined in section 41-09-02, there is imposed a tax of three percent upon the:

Gross receipts of retailers from all sales at retail of manufactured homes used for residential or business purposes, except as provided in subsection 35 of section 57-39.2-04; or

Dealer’s cost to purchase the manufactured home if the manufactured home is sold in conjunction with installation in this state, and tax has not previously been paid under subdivision a.

Installation of a manufactured home includes any method established under section 54-21.3-08.

Source:

I.M. approved November 2, 1976, S.L. 1977, ch. 593, § 1; 1981, ch. 598, § 2; 1981, ch. 599, § 2; 1981, ch. 601, § 1; 1981, ch. 602, § 1; 1983, ch. 632, § 1; 1983, ch. 644, § 1; 1983, ch. 645, § 1; 1985, ch. 641, § 2; 1987, ch. 687, § 3, R.M. disapproved June 14, 1988; 1987, ch. 705, § 1; 1987, ch. 707, § 1; 1987, ch. 708, § 1; 1989, ch. 713, § 2; 1989, ch. 714, § 1, R.M. disapproved December 5, 1989, S.L. 1991, ch. 740; S.L. 1991, ch. 676, § 1; 1997, ch. 496, § 1; 1999, ch. 516, § 1; 1999, ch. 517, § 1; 1999, ch. 518, § 1; 2001, ch. 534, § 2; 2001, ch. 535, § 2; 2003, ch. 539, § 5; 2005, ch. 15, § 40; 2005, ch. 580, § 5; 2005, ch. 582, § 2; 2007, ch. 446, § 4; 2007, ch. 528, § 4; 2007, ch. 529, § 1; 2009, ch. 556, § 2; 2011, ch. 473, § 3; 2011, ch. 465, § 2; 2013, ch. 458, § 1; 2015, ch. 450, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 95, § 3, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2019; 2019, ch. 341, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross-References.

City lodging tax, see N.D.C.C. ch. 40-57.3.

57-39.2-02.2.
Certain sellers located outside this state required to collect and remit sales taxes — Criteria.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any seller of tangible personal property or other taxable product for delivery in this state, which does not have a physical presence in this state, is subject to this chapter and chapter 57-40.2 and shall remit sales or use tax if the seller’s gross sales from the sale of tangible personal property and other taxable items delivered in this state exceed one hundred thousand dollars in the previous calendar year, or the current calendar year. A seller that exceeds this sales threshold shall obtain a permit under section 57-39.2-14, and begin collecting the tax on sales delivered during the following calendar year or beginning sixty days after the threshold is met, whichever is earlier. The seller shall follow all applicable procedures and requirements of law as if the seller has a physical presence in this state.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 408, § 1, effective June 21, 2018; 2019, ch. 497, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018.

Note.

Section 3 of chapter 408, S.L. 2017 provides, “

CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE.

This Act becomes effective on the date the United States Supreme Court issues an opinion overturning
Quill v. North Dakota, 504 U.S. 298 (1992), or otherwise confirming a state may constitutionally impose its sales or use tax upon an out-of-state seller in circumstances similar to those specified in this section.” [Contingency met in 2018]

This section is set out above to reflect that the contingency of the section has been met.
See contingency note.

57-39.2-02.3.
Marketplace facilitator tax collection requirement.

For the purposes of this section:

“Exemption certificate” means documentation furnished by a buyer to a seller to claim an exemption from sales tax or use tax. The term includes a resale certificate or other documentation authorized in section 57-39.2-10 furnished by a buyer to a seller.

“Marketplace” means a physical or electronic place where one or more marketplace sellers sell or offer for sale tangible personal property or other products or services subject to tax under section 57-39.2-02.1, regardless of whether the marketplace seller has a physical presence in this state. A physical or electronic place includes a store, booth, internet website, catalog, television, radio broadcast, or a dedicated sales software application.

“Marketplace facilitator” means a person that:

Contracts with sellers to facilitate for consideration, regardless of whether deducted as fees from the transaction, the sale of the seller’s products through a physical or electronic marketplace operated by the person;

Engages directly or indirectly, through one or more affiliated persons, in any of the following:

Transmitting or otherwise communicating the offer or acceptance between the buyer and seller;

Owning or operating the infrastructure, electronic or physical, or technology that brings buyers and sellers together;

Providing a virtual currency that buyers are allowed or required to use to purchase products from the seller; or

Software development or research and development activities related to any of the activities described in subparagraph a, if such activities are directly related to a physical presence or electronic marketplace operated by the person or an affiliated person; and

Engages in any of the following activities with respect to the seller’s products:

Payment processing services;

Fulfillment or storage services;

Listing products for sale;

Setting prices;

Branding sales as those of the marketplace facilitator;

Order taking;

Advertising or promotion; or

Providing customer service or accepting or assisting with returns or exchanges.

The term does not include a payment processor business appointed by a merchant to handle payment transactions from various channels, such as credit cards and debit cards, and whose sole activity with respect to marketplace sales is to handle transactions between two parties.

“Marketplace seller” means a retailer that sells or offers for sale tangible personal property or other products or services subject to tax under section 57-39.2-02.1, through a marketplace that is owned, operated, or controlled by a marketplace facilitator.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any marketplace facilitator facilitating sales of tangible personal property or other products or services subject to tax under section 57-39.2-02.1, which does not have a physical presence in this state, is a retailer subject to chapters 57-39.2 and 57-40.2 and shall remit sales or use tax if the marketplace facilitator facilitates or makes sales through the marketplace that, when the sales are combined, meet the threshold amount in section 57-39.2-02.2. A marketplace facilitator exceeding the sales threshold shall obtain a permit under section 57-39.2-14, and begin collecting the tax on sales during the following calendar year or beginning sixty days after the threshold is met, whichever is earlier.

A marketplace facilitator shall be considered the retailer of each sale the facilitator facilitates on its forum for a marketplace seller. Each marketplace facilitator shall:

Be required to collect and remit for each sale any tax imposed under chapters 57-39.2 and 57-40.2.

Be responsible for all obligations imposed under chapter 57-39.2 as if the marketplace facilitator was the retailer of the sale.

In accordance with the provisions of section 57-39.2-10, keep such records and information as may be required by the tax commissioner to ensure proper collection and remittance of tax.

Certify to its marketplace sellers that it will collect and remit state and local sales and use tax on sales of tangible personal property or other products or services subject to tax under section 57-39.2-02.1 made through the marketplace. A marketplace seller that accepts a marketplace facilitator’s collection certificate in good faith may exclude sales made through the marketplace from the marketplace seller’s return of gross receipts under section 57-39.2-11.

Be subject to audit by the tax commissioner with respect to all retail sales for which it is required to collect and pay the tax imposed under chapters 57-39.2 and 57-40.2. If the tax commissioner audits the marketplace facilitator, the tax commissioner is prohibited from auditing the marketplace seller for the same retail sales unless the marketplace facilitator seeks relief under subsection 4.

A marketplace facilitator is not liable under this section for failure to collect and remit sales and use tax if the marketplace facilitator demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that:

The marketplace facilitator has a system in place to require the seller to provide accurate information and has made a reasonable effort to obtain accurate information from the seller about a retail transaction;

The failure to collect and remit the correct tax was due to reliance upon incorrect or insufficient information provided to the marketplace facilitator by the seller. If the marketplace facilitator is relieved of liability under this subsection, the seller and the purchaser are liable for any amount of uncollected, unpaid, or unremitted tax; and

The marketplace facilitator and marketplace seller are not affiliated. A marketplace facilitator and a marketplace seller are affiliated if:

Either owns more than five percent of the other; or

Both are subject to the control of a common entity that owns more than five percent of each.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the tax imposed under this section may be refunded under the following conditions:

A person qualifying for an exemption under subsection 5, 6, 24, 32, 43, 48, or 52 of section 57-39.2-04 may apply in writing to the tax commissioner on a form and in the manner as the tax commissioner may prescribe reciting sufficient facts establishing the exempt status of the sale.

The refund is five dollars or more. Qualifying sales may be accumulated for periods not in excess of one calendar year in order to reach the five dollar limit.

A class action may not be brought against a marketplace facilitator on behalf of purchasers arising from or in any way related to an overpayment of sales or use tax collected by the marketplace facilitator, regardless of whether such action is characterized as a tax refund claim.

No marketplace facilitator is required to collect or remit sales or use tax under this section on any sale made before October 1, 2019.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 496, § 2, eff for taxable events occurring after July 1, 2019.

57-39.2-03.
Separate and additional tax on retail sales. [Repealed]

Repealed by I.M. approved November 2, 1976, S.L. 1977, ch. 593, § 6.

57-39.2-03.1.
Separate and additional tax on retail sales. [Repealed]

Repealed by I.M. approved November 2, 1976, S.L. 1977, ch. 593, § 6.

57-39.2-03.2.
Sales tax on alcoholic beverages and tobacco products. [Expired]

Expired under S.L. 2003, ch. 539, § 25; S.L. 2005, ch. 582, § 2.

57-39.2-03.3.
Sales tax on sales through vending machines.

Gross receipts from the sale of tangible personal property costing sixteen cents or more sold through a coin-operated vending machine are subject to the sales tax imposed by chapter 57-39.2, and gross receipts from the sale of tangible personal property costing fifteen cents or less sold through a coin-operated vending machine are specifically exempted from the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 528, § 17; 2009, ch. 559, § 1.

Collateral References.

Automatic vending machine sales, 91 A.L.R.2d 1127.

57-39.2-03.4.
Sales tax on carpet and drapes. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 571, § 1.

57-39.2-03.5.
Reduced rate for manufacturing machinery and equipment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 680, § 2.

Cross-References.

Sales tax exemption for manufacturing machinery and equipment, N.D.C.C. § 57-39.2-04.3.

57-39.2-03.6.
Sales tax rate on natural gas sales. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 529, § 7.

57-39.2-03.7.
Surcharge on rental motor vehicles.

A company engaged in the business of renting motor vehicles for periods of fewer than thirty days shall collect a three percent surcharge on each rental contract at the time a vehicle of a gross vehicle weight of ten thousand pounds [4535.92 kilograms] or less is rented from the company in this state. A vehicle is considered rented in this state if possession is obtained by the renter in this state. The surcharge must be computed on the total dollar amount for the rental as stated in the rental contract, excluding taxes, fuel collections, or other ancillary products sold to customers such as collision damage waiver, supplemental liability protection, personal accident insurance, and personal effects coverage.

A surcharge under this section must be noted in the rental contract and collected in accordance with the terms of the contract.

On February fifteenth of each year, a company that collects surcharges under this section shall file a report with the commissioner stating the total amount of excise taxes paid under chapter 57-40.3 on the rental vehicles for the preceding calendar year and the total amount of rental motor vehicle revenues earned on rentals in this state for the preceding calendar year. All surcharge revenues collected during the calendar year by the company in excess of the total amount of excise taxes paid under chapter 57-40.3 during the calendar year by the company on rental motor vehicles must be remitted to the commissioner with the report and considered sales tax collections under this chapter.

For three years after filing the report under this section, the company shall retain copies of rental contracts and the commissioner may require the company to furnish copies of rental contracts for purposes of ensuring compliance with this section.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 536, § 1; 2003, ch. 534, § 1.

57-39.2-03.8.
Separate and additional sales tax on lodging. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 580, § 19.

57-39.2-03.9.
Sales tax on tobacco products.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the sales taxes imposed by this chapter apply to the gross receipts of retailers from all sales at retail of cigarettes, cigars, and other tobacco products. For purposes of this section, “gross receipts” from the sale of cigarettes, cigars, and other tobacco products includes any other taxes imposed on such merchandise or its use or on the retail or other sale of such merchandise.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 15, § 40; 2005, ch. 580, § 6.